District of Columbia statutes.
31-1809

Examination authority.

(a)

A reinsurance intermediary shall be subject to examination by the Mayor. The Mayor shall have access to all books, bank accounts, and records of the reinsurance intermediary in a form usable to the Mayor.

(b)

A reinsurance manager may be examined as if it were the reinsurer.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-47, § 10, 40 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 35-3109.